Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.140

Forest roads may be maintained from road fund.

The board may maintain any forest roads within its county and expend for the maintenance thereof funds accruing to the county road fund.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.82.140. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 45; RRS s 6450-45.]